Hawaii, session 2025, HB195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 6E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§6E-     Port heritage sites.  (a) The state historic preservation division of the department shall consult with the harbors division of the department of transportation to identify and preserve historically significant areas within each state harbor. (b)  The state historic preservation division shall create and place at each historically significant area identified by the department an educational display for public awareness describing the historical significance of the area." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________